Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-134.01
Order; enjoin, when.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 75-132.01, 75-134, 75-144, and 75-1012 and the State Natural Gas Regulation Act, the district courts shall have jurisdiction to enjoin a commission order only when the order was not entered (1) in accordance with Chapter 75 or 86 and the commission's rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such chapters or (2) in accordance with other statutory authority underlying the commission's order.

Laws 1967, c. 479, § 6, p. 1477;

Laws 2000, LB 1285, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 485;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 75-122.01;

Laws 2003, LB 187, § 20;

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 67.

State Natural Gas Regulation Act, see section 66-1801.